Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-826
Legislative intent regarding appropriations; allocation.

It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate from the General Fund five hundred thousand dollars for fiscal year 2009-10 and one million dollars for fiscal year 2010-11 to the Department of Health and Human Services — Behavioral Health, Program 38, Behavioral Health Aid, for behavioral health services for children under the Nebraska Behavioral Health Services Act, including, but not limited to, the expansion of the Professional Partner Program and services provided using a sliding-fee schedule. General Funds appropriated pursuant to this section shall be excluded from the calculation of county matching funds under subsection (3) of section 71-808, shall be allocated to the regional behavioral health authorities, and shall be distributed based on the 2008 allocation formula. For purposes of this section, children means Nebraska residents under nineteen years of age.

Laws 2009, LB603, § 10.